Hawaii statutes.
Rule 902 Self-authentication.
Extrinsic evidence of authenticity as a condition precedent to admissibility is
not required with respect to the following:

(1) Domestic public documents under seal. A document
bearing a seal purporting to be that of the United States, or of any state,
district, commonwealth, territory, or insular possession thereof, or the Panama
Canal Zone, or the Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands, or of a political
subdivision, department, officer, or agency thereof, and a signature purporting
to be an attestation or execution.

(2) Domestic public documents not under seal. A
document purporting to bear the signature in the official capacity of an
officer or employee of any entity included in paragraph (1), having no seal, if
a public officer having a seal and having official duties in the district or
political subdivision of the officer or employee certifies under seal that the
signer has the official capacity and that the signature is genuine.

(3) Foreign public documents. A document purporting
to be executed or attested in an official capacity by a person authorized by
the laws of a foreign country to make the execution or attestation, and
accompanied by a final certification as to the genuineness of the signature and
official position (A) of the executing or attesting person, or (B) of any
foreign official whose certificate of genuineness of signature and official
position relates to the execution or attestation or is in a chain of
certificates of genuineness of signature and official position relating to the
execution or attestation. A final certification may be made by a secretary of
embassy or legation, consul general, consul, vice consul, or consular agent of
the United States, or a diplomatic or consular official of the foreign country
assigned or accredited to the United States. If reasonable opportunity has
been given to all parties to investigate the authenticity and accuracy of
official documents, the court may, for good cause shown, order that they be
treated as presumptively authentic without final certification or permit them
to be evidenced by an attested summary with or without final certification.

(4) Certified copies of public records. A copy of an
official record or report or entry therein, or of a document authorized by law
to be recorded or filed and actually recorded or filed in a public office,
including data compilations in any form, certified as correct by the custodian
or other person authorized to make the certification, by certificate complying
with paragraph (1), (2), or (3) or complying with any statute or rule
prescribed by the supreme court.

(5) Official publications. Books, pamphlets, or
other publications purporting to be issued by public authority.

(6) Newspapers and periodicals. Printed materials
purporting to be newspapers or periodicals.

(7) Trade inscriptions and the like. Inscriptions,
signs, tags, or labels purporting to have been affixed in the course of
business and indicating ownership, control, or origin.

(8) Acknowledged documents. Documents accompanied by
a certificate of acknowledgment executed in the manner provided by law by a
notary public or other officer authorized by law to take acknowledgments.

(9) Commercial paper and related documents.
Commercial paper, signatures thereon, and documents relating thereto to the
extent provided by general commercial law.

(10) Presumptions under statutes. Any signature,
document, or other matter declared by statute to be presumptively or prima
facie genuine or authentic.

(11) Certified records of regularly conducted
activity. The original or a duplicate of a domestic or foreign record of
regularly conducted activity that would be admissible under rule 803(b)(6), if
accompanied by a written declaration of its custodian or other qualified
person, certifying that the record was:

(A) Made at or near the time of the
occurrence of the matters set forth by, or from information transmitted by, a
person with knowledge of those matters;

(B) Kept in the course of the regularly
conducted activity; and

(C) Made by the regularly conducted activity
as a regular practice.

The declaration shall be signed in a manner that,
if falsely made, would subject the maker to a criminal penalty under the laws
of the state or country where the declaration is signed. A party intending to
offer a record into evidence under this paragraph shall provide reasonable
notice in advance of trial, or during trial if the court excuses pretrial
notice on good cause shown, of that intention to all adverse parties, and shall
make the record and declaration available for inspection sufficiently in
advance of their offer into evidence to provide an adverse party with a fair
opportunity to challenge them. [L 1980, c 164, pt of §1; am L 1992, c 191,
§2(9); am L 2002, c 134, §6]

RULE 902 COMMENTARY

This rule is identical with Fed. R. Evid. 902 except
for the substitution, in paragraph (4), of the words, "statute or rule
prescribed by the supreme court," for the federal language, "Act of
Congress or rule prescribed by the Supreme Court pursuant to statutory
authority," and the substitution, in paragraph (10), of
"statute" for "Act of Congress."
"Self-authentication," as the name implies, denotes a finding of
identity or authenticity of an item based on its mere purport, without recourse
to extrinsic evidence. The present rule restates a number of superseded
statutes. As the Advisory Committee's Note to Fed. R. Evid. 902 points out,
"In no instance is the opposite party foreclosed from disputing
authenticity."

Paragraph (1): The Advisory Committee's Note to Fed. R.
Evid. 902(1) says: "Whether theoretically based in whole or in part upon
judicial notice the practical underlying considerations are that forgery is a
crime and detection is fairly easy and certain."

Paragraph (2): In the case of public documents not under
seal, as the Advisory Committee's Note to Fed. R. Evid. 902(2) explains, the
potential for forgery is greater than in the case of sealed documents.
"Hence this paragraph of the rule calls for authentication by an officer
who has a seal."

Paragraph (3): This provision extends the presumption of
authenticity to foreign documents that have been attested or certified.
Compare HRCP 44(a)(2) and Ewing v. Janion, 1 H. 79 (134), (136) (1852).

Paragraph (4): Consistent with the practice in most
jurisdictions, Hawaii has long recognized the procedure of authenticating
public records by certification. A variety of statutes establish certification
procedures for specific types of public records, see, e.g., Hawaii Rev. Stat.
§§502-81, 572-13(c) (1976, Supp. 1979). Court procedural rules are in accord,
see HRCP 44(a); HRCrP 27.

The requirement for proper certification of copies of such
records has been affirmed by the Hawaii courts. See, e.g., Territory v. Branco,
42 H. 304 (1958), in which the court barred admission of photostatic copies of
the minutes of the board of public lands because the accompanying certificate
of authenticity was not signed by the officer who had legal custody of the
records.

It should be noted that certifications are, in themselves,
documents requiring authentication independently of the records to which they
are appended. They may be received as self-authenticating when prepared and
offered in conformity with paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of this rule, or when
they are accorded a presumption of authenticity by statute, consistent with
paragraph (10) of this rule.

Paragraph (5): This rule consolidates the provisions of a
number of superseded Hawaii statutes. As the Advisory Committee's Note to Fed.
R. Evid. 902(5) points out, this paragraph "does not confer admissibility
upon all official publications; it merely provides a means whereby their
authenticity may be taken as established for purposes of admissibility."

Paragraph (6): The circumstantial guarantee of authenticity
of newspapers and periodicals is sufficiently great to justify a preliminary
assumption of admissibility. In Territory v. Sur, 36 H. 332, 340 (1952), the
court approved admission of newspaper accounts of football games for the
purpose of proving that the games were played on a specific date.

Paragraph (7): The issue of self-authentication of
mercantile labels, inscriptions, and trademarks has not been addressed in Hawaii; however, it has found increasing support in other jurisdictions, see Fed. R. Evid.
902(7), Advisory Committee's Note, and the circumstantial guarantee of
authenticity of such evidence is great.

Paragraph (8): See Fed. R. Evid. 902(8), Advisory Committee's
Note: "In virtually every state, acknowledged title documents are
receivable in evidence without further proof.... If this authentication
suffices for documents of the importance of those affecting titles, logic
scarcely permits denying this method when other kinds of documents are involved."

Paragraph (9): This provision affirms the authentication
provisions for negotiable instruments and commercial paper, as defined in the
Uniform Commercial Code. Pertinent statutes include Hawaii Rev. Stat.
§490:1-202, which provides that various types of commercial documents issued by
a third party are prima facie evidence of both their own authenticity and of
the facts stated in them; §490:3-307, which establishes the presumption that
signatures on a negotiable instrument are genuine or authorized; and
§490:3-510, which establishes self-authenticating evidence of dishonor of a
negotiable instrument. See Akamine and Sons, Ltd. v. American Security Bank,
50 H. 304, 440 P.2d 262 (1968).

Paragraph (10): Consistent with the parallel provision in
Rule 901(b)(10) supra, this paragraph affirms the validity of other statutory
provisions for self-authentication. Nothing in this rule should be construed
to supersede such provisions.

RULE 902 SUPPLEMENTAL COMMENTARY

The Act 134, Session Laws 2002 amendment adds paragraph (11)
to the collection of self-­authenticating documents of Rule 902, and thus
implements the certification procedure established in the 2002 amendment to Rule
803(b)(6) ("records of regularly conducted activity"). The Federal
Rules of Evidence and Uniform Rules of Evidence have similarly modified Rule
902.

Case Notes

Records of regularly conducted activity.

State did not establish a sufficient foundation to admit
speed check card as a business record under HRE rule 803(b)(6) where record did
not (1) include a certification that complies with paragraph (11) or other
statute permitting certification, (2) reflect that officer was testifying as a
custodian of the speed check card, or (3) officer's testimony did not
adequately establish that there were other indicia of reliability. 122 H. 354,
227 P.3d 520 (2010).

Where exhibit was not authenticated by a citation to a
verified source, and without this certification, the document was hearsay and
did not fall under any hearsay exception, by applying rules 801 and 901 and
this rule, the exhibit was inadmissible and could not be considered by the
trial court. 114 H. 56 (App.), 156 P.3d 482 (2006).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next